Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,133
Prohibited acts; threat of harm to member of Board of Pardons; penalty.

A person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony if he threatens or attempts to threaten harm to a member of the Board of Pardons with the purpose to influence his decision, opinion, recommendation, vote, or other exercise of discretion as member of the board or if he purposely or knowingly privately addresses to any member of the board any representation, entreaty, argument or other communication designed to influence the outcome of any application which is or may come before the board on the basis of considerations other than those authorized by law.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 64, p. 3104;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 311;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 47.